California, session 20252026, SB854.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:22. Except as otherwise specified, for purposes of this code, “mail,” “mailing,” or “mailed” include a writing transmitted by the United States Postal Service or other common mail carrier or by electronic transmission. For purposes of an electronic transmission, “postmark date” means the date on which the writing was sent.